Hawaii statutes.
[§229-3] Initiating sister-state
relationships. The Hawaii sister-state committee shall evaluate and
develop recommendations for the initiation of all sister-state or province
relationships and forward its recommendation to the legislature. The legislature,
if it so chooses, shall implement the recommendation to initiate a sister-state
or province relationship by either adopting a concurrent resolution or by
enacting session law to that effect. [L 2006, c 150, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next